Utah statutes.
58-53-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  Each applicant for licensure as a landscape architect shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  provide satisfactory evidence of good moral character;
(d) (i)  have graduated and received an earned bachelors or masters degree
from a landscape architecture program meeting criteria established by rule by
the division in collaboration with the board; or
(ii)  have completed not less than eight years of supervised practical
experience in landscape architecture which meets the requirements established
by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and
(e)  have successfully passed examinations established by rule by the division
in collaboration with the board.
(2)  Satisfactory completion of each year of a landscape architectural program
described in Subsection (1)(d)(i) is equivalent to one year of experience for
purposes of Subsection (1)(d)(ii).
